Utah statutes.
73-3b-107.   Recoverable water -- State engineer to determine.

A person who holds a recovery permit may recover the amount of water stored by the recharge project which the state engineer determines has reached the aquifer and remains within the hydrologic area of influence.



Enacted by Chapter 146, 1991 General Session

